North Dakota, session 69, SB2151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 21-10-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
21-10-13. Legacy earnings fund - State treasurer - Transfers.
1. There is created in the state treasury the legacy earnings fund. The fund consists of all
moneys transferred to the fund under subsection 2 and all interest and earnings upon
moneys in the fund.
2. Any legacy fund earnings transferred to the general fund at the end of each biennium
in accordance with section 26 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota must be
immediately transferred by the state treasurer to the legacy earnings fund.
3. For each biennium subsequent to the biennium in which the legacy fund earnings are
transferred under subsection 2, the amount available for appropriation from the legacy
earnings fund is seven percent of the five-year average value of the legacy fund
assets as reported by the state investment board. The average value of the legacy
fund assets must be calculated using the value of the assets at the end of each fiscal
year for the five-year period ending with the most recently completed even-numbered
fiscal year.
Page No. 1 25.0680.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. On July first of each odd-numbered year, from the amount available for appropriation
or transfer from the legacy earnings fund for the biennium, the state treasurer shall
transfer funding in the following order:
a. The first one hundred two million six hundred twenty-four thousand dollars or an
amount equal to the amount appropriated from the legacy sinking and interest
fund for debt service payments for a biennium, whichever is less, to the legacy
sinking and interest fund under section 6-09.4-10.1.
b. The next two hundred twenty-five million dollars to the general fund to provide
support for tax relief initiatives approved by the legislative assembly.
c. The next one hundred million dollars to the legacy earnings highway distribution
fund for allocations under section 54-27-19.3.
d.c. The next one hundred million dollars to the county and township bridge fund
under section 2 of this Act .
d. Any remaining amounts under this subsection as follows:
(1) Fifty percent to the general fund.
(2) The remaining fifty percent to the strategic investment and improvements
fund to be used in accordance with the provisions of section 15-08.1-08.to
the legacy earnings tax relief fund under section 3 of this Act .
5. If the amounts transferred under subsection 2 exceed the amount available for
appropriation under subsection 3, the state treasurer shall transfer the excess and any
remaining amounts after the transfers and appropriations under subsection 4, as
follows:
a. Fifty percent to the general fund.
b. The remaining fifty percent to the strategic investment and improvements fund to
be used in accordance with the provisions of section 15-08.1-08 to the legacy
earnings tax relief fund under section 3 of this Ac t.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 54-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
County and township bridge fund.
1. There is created in the state treasury the county and township bridge fund. The fund
consists of all moneys deposited in the fund under section 21 - 10 - 13 .
Page No. 2 25.0680.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. Moneys in the fund may be spent pursuant to legislative appropriations for providing
grants to counties for the repair or replacement of county and township bridges within
the county.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 54-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Legacy earnings tax relief fund.
1. There is created in the state treasury the legacy earnings tax relief fund. The fund
consists of all moneys deposited in the fund under section 21 - 10 - 13 .
2. Moneys in the fund may be spent pursuant to legislative appropriations for tax relief
programs.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - STATE TREASURER - COUNTY AND TOWNSHIP
BRIDGE FUND. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the county and township bridge
fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $80,000,000, or so much of
the sum as may be necessary, to the state treasurer for the purpose of providing grants to
eligible counties for county and township bridge repairs or replacement within the county, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The state treasurer shall distribute
the grant funds based on each eligible county's percentage share of eligible county and
township bridge repair and replacement needs identified in the most recent North Dakota state
university upper great plains transportation institute's report on county and township road and
bridge needs. A county with organized townships shall allocate the share of its grant applicable
to township bridges to the appropriate organized townships within the county. For purposes of
this section, an "eligible county" means a county that would receive an allocation of $500,000 or
more based on $100,000,000 being available to distribute to all counties using a formula based
on each county's percentage share of county and township bridge repair and replacement
needs identified in the upper great plains transportation institute's report.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION - COUNTY AND
TOWNSHIP BRIDGE FUND. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the county and
township bridge fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $20,000,000,
or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of transportation for the purpose
of county and township bridge repairs or replacements, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027. The department of transportation shall develop an application
Page No. 3 25.0680.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
process to provide funding for projects in eligible counties under this section. For purposes of
this section, an "eligible county" is a county that would receive an allocation of less than
$500,000 based on $100,000,000 being available to distribute to all counties using a formula
based on each county's percentage share of county and township bridge repair and
replacement needs identified in the most recent North Dakota state university upper great plains
transportation institute's report on county and township road and bridge needs.
SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - FUTURE FUNDING FOR COUNTY AND
TOWNSHIP BRIDGES. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that funding
continue to be appropriated from the county and township bridge fund for county and township
bridge projects each biennium through June 30, 2035.
SECTION 7. EXPIRATION DATE. Section 1 of this Act is effective through June 30, 2035,
and after that date is ineffective.
Page No. 4 25.0680.02000